Idaho, session 2026, H0975.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. CASH TRANSFERS FROM THE BUDGET STABILIZATION FUND IN FIS-
CAL YEARS 2026 AND 2027. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 57-814,
Idaho Code, which limits the allowable balance in the Budget Stabilization
Fund to 15% of total General Fund receipts for the fiscal year just ending and
requires the Office of the State Controller to transfer excess moneys in the
Budget Stabilization Fund back to the General Fund, and notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, the Office of the State Controller
shall not transfer funds from the Budget Stabilization Fund to the General
Fund for the period June 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
June 1, 2026.